Idaho, session 2026, S1309.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 32, Title 31, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 31-3201K, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
31-3201K. DISTRIBUTION OF PAYMENTS IN CASES UNDER THE JUVENILE COR-
RECTIONS ACT. When ordered by the court to make one (1) of the following pay-
ments in a case filed under the juvenile corrections act, chapter 5, title
20, Idaho Code, the person so ordered shall make the payment to the clerk
of the court in which the judgment was entered. The judgment shall be sat-
isfied accordingly by entry in the electronic docket of the court, and the
clerk of the court shall remit daily all such payments to the county auditor,
who shall, at least monthly, distribute the payments received as required by
statute. The distributions shall first completely satisfy the amounts due
in the following order before distribution of payments for any other amounts
owed to the court, and any payment applied to a category as provided in this
section in which more than one (1) payment was ordered shall be distributed
in proportion to the relative amounts of such ordered payments:
(1) Restitution to or making whole any victim who suffers an economic
loss as a result of the juvenile offender's conduct paid pursuant to section
20-520(3), Idaho Code;
(2) Detention/probation training academy fee paid pursuant to section
20-520(1)(q), Idaho Code;
(3) Juvenile drug court or mental health court fee paid pursuant to sec-
tion 31-3201E, Idaho Code;
(4) Juvenile pretrial supervision fee paid pursuant to section
20-516A, Idaho Code;
(5) County juvenile probation supervision fee paid pursuant to section
20-520(1)(s), Idaho Code;
(6) Court-ordered tests of breath or bodily fluids pursuant to section
19-2608, Idaho Code;
(7) Community service fee paid pursuant to section 20-520(1)(r), Idaho
Code;
(8) Probationary contract violation assessment paid pursuant to sec-
tion 20-522, Idaho Code;
(9) Detention costs paid pursuant to section 20-524(2), Idaho Code;


(10) Costs of support and treatment of a juvenile paid pursuant to sec-
tion 20-524(1), Idaho Code;
(11) Reimbursement of public defender costs paid pursuant to section
20-514(7), Idaho Code;
(12) Reimbursement for costs of toxicology testing paid pursuant to
section 37-2732C(g), Idaho Code;
(13) Reimbursement for costs incurred by law enforcement agencies in
investigating controlled substance violations pursuant to chapter 27, ti-
tle 37, Idaho Code, violations of the racketeering act pursuant to section
18-7804, Idaho Code, or money laundering and illegal investment provisions
of section 18-8201, Idaho Code, paid pursuant to 37-2732(k), Idaho Code;
(14) Reimbursement for costs paid by a county for psychosexual evalua-
tions paid pursuant to section 18-8318, Idaho Code; and
(15) Any other amounts paid pursuant to any statutory section not refer-
enced in this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.